Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 18. Transition Provisions

§ 17-20-1801.
Application.

This act applies to all cooperative utilities, including rural electric associations, whether formed before the effective date of this act or not.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-20-140(a)(iii).